Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.330.060

Superintendent's bond and oath.

Before entering upon the discharge of the superintendent's duties, the superintendent as secretary of the board shall give bond in such sum as the board of directors may fix from time to time, but for not less than five thousand dollars, with good and sufficient sureties, and shall take and subscribe an oath or affirmation, before a proper officer that he or she will support the Constitution of the United States and of the state of Washington and faithfully perform the duties of the office, a copy of which oath or affirmation shall be filed with the educational service district superintendent.

[ 1990 c 33 s 345; 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 117; 1971 c 48 s 33; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.59.080. Prior: 1909 c 97 p 291 s 8; RRS s 4797. Formerly RCW 28A.59.080, 28.62.080.]

NOTES:

Severability—1971 c 48: See note following RCW 28A.310.250.